Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-104 Jurisdiction and venue.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), no delinquency proceeding may be
commenced under this article by anyone other than the commissioner of this
State.

(b)(1) Three or more judgment
creditors holding unrelated judgments against an insurer, which
judgments aggregate more than $5,000 in excess of any security held by those
creditors may commence proceedings against the insurer under the conditions and
in the manner prescribed in this subsection, by serving notice upon the
commissioner and the insurer of intention to file a petition for liquidation
under section 431:15-305 or 431:15-402. Each of the judgments:

(A) Shall have been rendered against the
insurer by a court in this State having jurisdiction over the subject matter
and the insurer;

(B) Shall have been entered more than sixty
days before the service of notice under this subsection;

(C) May not be the subject of a valid
contract between the insurer and any judgment creditor for payment of the
judgment, unless that contract has been breached by the insurer;

(D) May not have been satisfied in full;

(E) May not be a judgment assigned to
institute proceedings under this subsection; and

(F) May not be a judgment on which an appeal
or review is pending or may yet be brought.

(2) If any one of the judgments in favor of a
petitioning creditor remains unpaid for thirty days after service of the notice
under this subsection, and the commissioner has not then filed a petition for
liquidation, the creditor may file a verified petition for liquidation of the
insurer in the manner prescribed by section 431:15-305 or 431:15-402, alleging
the conditions stated in this subsection. The commissioner shall be served and
joined in the action.

(c) No court of this State has jurisdiction to
entertain, hear or determine any complaint praying for the dissolution,
liquidation, rehabilitation, sequestration, conservation, or receivership of
any insurer, or praying for an injunction or restraining order or other relief
preliminary to, incidental to, or relating to that type of proceedings other
than in accordance with this article.

(d) Venue for proceedings arising under this
article shall be laid initially as specified in the sections providing for
those proceedings. All other actions and proceedings initiated by the receiver
may be commenced and tried where the delinquency proceedings are then pending,
or where venue would be laid by applicable state law. All other actions and
proceedings against the receiver shall be commenced and tried in the county
where the delinquency proceedings are pending. Upon motion of any party, venue
may be changed by order of the court or the presiding judge of the court to any
other circuit court in this State, whenever the convenience of the parties and
witnesses and the ends of justice requires it. This subsection relates only to
venue and is not jurisdictional.

(e) In addition to other grounds for
jurisdiction provided by the law of this State, a court of this State having
jurisdiction of the subject matter has jurisdiction over a person served
pursuant to the Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable provisions
of law in an action brought by the receiver of a domestic insurer or an alien
insurer domiciled in this State:

(1) If the person served is obligated to the insurer
in any way as an incident to any agency or brokerage arrangement that may exist
or has existed between the insurer and the producer, in any action on or
incident to the obligation;

(2) If the person served is a reinsurer who has at
any time written a policy of reinsurance for an insurer against which a
rehabilitation or liquidation order is in effect when the action is commenced,
or is a producer of or for the reinsurer, in any action on or incident to the
reinsurance contract; or

(3) If the person served is or has been an officer,
manager, trustee, organizer, promoter, or person in a position of comparable
authority or influence in an insurer against which a rehabilitation or
liquidation order is in effect when the action is commenced, in any
action resulting from such a relationship with the insurer.

(f) If the court on the motion of any party
finds that any action commenced under subsection (e) should, as a matter of
substantial justice, be tried in a forum outside this State, the court may
enter an order to stay further proceedings on the action in this State.

(g) All actions herein authorized shall be
brought in the circuit court of the first circuit. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 2002, c 155, §83; am L 2004, c 122, §67]

Case Notes

Shareholder did not have standing to oppose petition to
liquidate insurer in delinquency proceedings. 80 H. 339, 910 P.2d 110.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next